en: Foundation material: Bamboo; Cotton; Fabric; Faux leather; Latex; Leather; Metal; Pine wood; Plastic; Plywood; Polyester; Spruce wood; Steel; Synthetic; Velvet; Wood; Wool; Other
sv: Foundation - material: Bambu; Bomull; Tyg; Fuskläder; Latex; Läder; Metall; Furu; Plast; Plywood; Polyester; Granträ; Stål; Syntetisk; Sammet; Trä; Ylle; Övrigt
ro-RO: Material bază: Bamboo; Bumbac; Textile; Imitație de piele; Latex; Piele; Metal; Lemn de pin; Plastic; Placaj; Poliester; Lemn de molid; Oțel; Sintetic; Catifea; Lemn; Lână; Altele
nb: Foundationmateriale: Bambus; Bomull; Stoff; Kunstig lær; Lateks; Skinn; Metall; Furutre; Plast; Kryssfiner; Polyester; Grantre; Stål; Syntetisk; Fløyel; Trevirke; Ull; Annet
nl: Materiaal foundation: Bamboe; Katoen; Stof; Kunstleer; Latex; Leer; Metaal; Dennenhout; Plastic; Multiplex; Polyester; Vurenhout; Staal; Synthetisch; Fluweel; Hout; Wol; Andere
fr: Matériau du fond de teint: Bambou; Coton; Tissu; Faux cuir; Latex; Cuir; Métal; Bois vivant; Plastique; Contre-plaqué; Polyester; Bois d’épicéa; Acier; Synthétique; Velours; Bois; Laine; Autre
th: วัสดุพื้นฐาน: ไผ่; สำลี; ผ้า; หนังเทียม; ยางพารา; หนัง; โลหะ; ไม้สน; พลาสติก; แผ่นไม้อัด; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ไม้สปรูซ; เหล็ก; สังเคราะห์; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ไม้; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
ko: 파운데이션 소재: 대나무; 면; 패브릭; 인조 가죽; 라텍스; 가죽; 금속; 소나무; 플라스틱; 합판; 폴리에스테르; 가문비나무; 강철; 인조; 벨벳; 목재; 울; 기타
de: Grundierungsmaterial: Bambus; Baumwolle; Stoff; Kunstleder; Latex; Leder; Metall; Pinienholz; Kunststoff; Sperrholz; Polyester; Fichtenholz; Stahl; Synthetisch; Samt; Holz; Wolle; Sonstiges
fi: Meikkivoiteen materiaali: Bambu; Puuvilla; Kangas; Keinonahka; Lateksi; Nahka; Metalli; Mäntypuu; Muovi; Vaneri; Polyesteri; Kuusi; Teräs; Synteettinen; Sametti; Puu; Villa; Muu
vi: Vật liệu nền: Tre; Vải bông; Vải; Da giả; Mủ cao su; Da; Kim loại; Gỗ thông; Nhựa; Gỗ ép; Polyester; Gỗ vân sam; Thép; Tổng hợp; Nhung; Gỗ; Len; Khác
bg-BG: Материал на основата: Бамбук; Памук; Плат; Изкуствена кожа; Латекс; Кожа; Метал; Борова дървесина; Пластмаса; Шперплат; Полиестер; Смърчова дървeсина; Стомана; Синтетичен; Кадифе; Дърво; Вълна; Други
el: Υλικό βάσης: Μπαμπού; Βαμβάκι; Ύφασμα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Μέταλλο; Ξύλο πεύκου; Πλαστικό; Κόντρα πλακέ; Πολυεστέρας; Ξύλο ελάτης; Χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Βελούδο; Ξύλο; Μαλλί; Άλλο
es: Material de base: Bambú; Algodón; Tejido; Cuero sintético; Látex; Cuero; Metal; Madera de pino; Plástico; Madera contrachapada; Poliéster; Madera de abeto; Acero; Sintético; Terciopelo; Madera; Lana; Otros
tr: Fondöten malzemesi: Bambu; Pamuk; Kumaşlar; Suni deri; Lateks; Deri; Metal; Çam ağacı; Plastik; Kontrplak; Poliyester; Ladin ağacı; Çelik; Sentetik; Kadife; Ahşap; Yünlüler; Diğer
da: Fundamentmateriale: Bambus; Bomuld; Stof; Kunstigt læder; Latex; Læder; Metal; Fyrretræ; Plast; Krydsfiner; Polyester; Grantræ; Stål; Syntetisk; Fløjl; Træ; Uld; Andet
cs: Materiál základny: Bambus; Bavlna; Látky; Nepravá kůže; Latex; Kůže; Kov; Borovicové dřevo; Plast; Překližka; Polyester; Smrkové dřevo; Ocel; Syntetické; Samet; Dřevo; Vlna; Jiné
sl-SI: Material osnove: Bambus; Bombaž; Tkanina; Umetno usnje; Latex; Usnje; Kovina; Borov les; Plastika; Vezane plošče; Poliester; Smrekov les; Jeklo; Sintetika; Žamet; Les; Volna; Drugo
ja: 基礎資料: バンブー; コットン; 布・生地; フェイクレザー; ラテックス; レザー; 金属; パイン材; プラスチック; 合板; ポリエステル; スプルース材; スチール; 合成品; ベルベット; 木材; ウール; その他
lt-LT: Pagrindo medžiaga: Bambukas; Medvilnė; Audinys; Dirbtinė oda; Lateksas; Oda; Metalas; Pušies mediena; Plastikas; Fanera; Poliesteris; Eglės mediena; Plienas; Sintetika; Aksomas; Mediena; Vilna; Kita
it: Materiale di fondazione: Bamboo; Cotone; Tessuto; Ecopelle; Lattice; Pelle; Metallo; Legno di pino; Plastica; Compensato; Poliestere; Legno di abete rosso; Acciaio; Sintetico; Velluto; Legno; Lana; Altro
pl: Materiał podkładu: Bambus; Bawełna; Tkanina; Skaj; Lateks; Skórzane; Metal; Drewno sosnowe; Tworzywo sztuczne; Sklejka; Poliester; Drewno świerkowe; Stal; Syntetyczne; Aksamit; Drewno; Wełna; Inne
zh-CN: 床垫架/排骨架材质: 竹子; 棉布; 面料/布料; 人造皮革; 乳胶; 皮革; 金属; 松树木材; 塑料; 胶合板; 聚酯纤维; 云杉木; 钢; 合成; 天鹅绒; 木头; 羊毛; 其他
ru: Материал основания: Бамбук; Хлопок; Ткань; Искусственная кожа; Латекс; Кожа; Металл; Сосна; Пластик; Фанера; Полиэстер; Ель; Сталь; Синтетика; Бархат; Дерево; Шерсть; Другой
pt-BR: Material de base: Bambu; Algodão; Tecido; Couro falso; Látex; Couro; Metal; Pinhal; Plástico; Madeira compensada; Poliéster; Madeira de abeto; Aço; Sintético; Veludo; Madeira; Lã; Outro
pt-PT: Material da base: Bambu; Algodão; Tecido; Couro falso; Látex; Pele; Metal; Madeira de pinho; Plástico; Contraplacado; Poliéster; Madeira de abeto; Aço; Sintético; Veludo; Madeira; Lã; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal osnove: Bambus; Pamuk; Tkanina; Umjetna koža; Lateks; Koža; Metal; Borovina; Plastika; Šperploča; Poliester; Smrekovina; Čelik; Sintetika; Baršun; Drvo; Vuna; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál konštrukcie: Bambus; Bavlna; Tkanina; Umelá koža; Latex; Koža; Kov; Borovicové drevo; Plast; Preglejka; Polyester; Smrekové drevo; Oceľ; Syntetický; Zamat; Drevo; Vlna; Iné
hu: Alap anyaga: Bambusz; Pamut; Szövet; Műbőr; Latex; Bőr; Fém; Fenyőfa; Műanyag; Furnér; Poliészter; Lucfenyő; Acél; Szintetikus; Bársony; Fa; Gyapjú; Egyéb
zh-TW: 基礎材料: 竹子; 棉布; 布料; 人造皮; 乳膠; 皮製; 金屬; 松木材; 塑膠; 合板; 聚酯; 杉木; 鋼; 合成; 天鵝絨; 木材; 羊毛; 其他